Utah statutes.
73-4-16.   Appeals.
From all final judgments of the district court there shall be a right of
appeal to the Supreme Court as in other cases. The appeal shall be upon the
record made in the district court, and may as in equity cases be on questions
of both law and fact. All proceedings on appeal shall be conducted according
to the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure.
